test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sihkihp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - sihkihp - ok : # -m animate noun, blackbird
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg: sihkihp
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl: sihkihpwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Loc: [sihkihpihk, sihkihpinâhk]
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: sihkihpis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: sihkihpisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [sihkihpisihk, sihkihpisinâhk]

     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisihkihpim
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisihkihpim
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpima
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisihkihpiminân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisihkihpiminaw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimiwâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpima
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisihkihpiminânak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisihkihpiminawak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimiwâwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisihkihpimisinân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisihkihpimisinaw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimisiwâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisihkihpimisinânak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisihkihpimisinawak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimisiwâwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nisihkihpimihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kisihkihpimihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: osihkihpimihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: osihkihpimiyihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisihkihpiminâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kisihkihpiminâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisihkihpimiwâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osihkihpimiwâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: osihkihpimiyihk

     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nisihkihpimisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kisihkihpimisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: osihkihpimisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: osihkihpimisiyihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisihkihpimisinâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kisihkihpimisinâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisihkihpimisiwâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osihkihpimisiwâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: osihkihpimisiyihk
